test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nounDES_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Nouns with Sub/Use tag and some other.

Tests:
  Noun - siebdde: # MUORRA
    siebdde+N+Sg+Nom: siebdde
    siebdde+N+Sg+Gen: siebde
    siebdde+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [sæbdáma, säbdáma]
    siebdde+N+Sg+Acc: siebdev
    siebdde+N+Sg+Ine: siebden
    siebdde+N+Ess: siebdden
    siebdde+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: [siebdestam, siebdestim]
    siebdde+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: [siebdestat, siebdestit]
    siebdde+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [siebdijnam, siebdijnim]
    siebdde+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sæbdásj, säbdásj]

  Noun - alkohåvllå: # MUORRA
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Nom: [alkohåvllå, alkohola]
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Acc: [alkohåvlåv, alkoholav]
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Com: [alkohåvlåjn, alkoholajn, alkoholajna, alkohåvlåjna]
    alkohåvllå+N+Ess: [alkohåvllån, alkoholan]
    alkohåvllå+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [alkohåvlåsj, alkoholasj]

  Noun - aksjonissta: # TURISSTA
    aksjonissta+N+Sg+Nom: [aksjonissta, aktionissta]
    aksjonissta+N+Sg+Acc: [aksjonistav, aktionistav]
    aksjonissta+N+Pl+Com: [aksjonistaj, aktionistaj]
    aksjonissta+N+Ess: [aktionisstan, aksjonisstan]
    aksjonissta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [aktionistasj, aksjonistasj]

  Noun - bállemmasjijnna: # MASKIN
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom: [bállemmasjijnna, bállemmásjijnna]
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ill: [bállemmasjijnnaj, bállemmásjijnnaj]
    bállemmasjijnna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bállemmasjijnasj, bállemmásjijnasj]

  Noun - semænnta: # MUORRA
    semænnta+N+Sg+Nom: [semænnta, semännta, cemænnta, cemännta, cemennta, semennta]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ine: [sementan, cementan]
    semænnta+N+Sg+Ill: [semænntaj, semänntaj, cemænntaj, semenntaj, cemenntaj, cemänntaj]
    semænnta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [sementasj, cementasj]

  Noun - diminutijvva: # ADJEKTIV
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Nom: [diminutijvva,deminutijvva]
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ine: [diminutijvan,deminutijvan]
    diminutijvva+N+Sg+Ill: [diminutijvvaj,deminutijvvaj]
    diminutijvva+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [diminutijvasj,deminutijvasj]

  Noun - dåbddomærkka: # MUORRA
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Nom: [dåbddomærkka, dåbddomärkka,dåbddåmærkka, dåbddåmärkka]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ine: [dåbddomerkan,dåbddåmerkan]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Sg+Ill: [dåbddomærkkaj, dåbddomärkkaj,dåbddåmærkkaj, dåbddåmärkkaj]
    dåbddomærkka+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dåbddomerkasj,dåbddåmerkasj]

  Noun - fabrihkka: # MUORRA
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Nom: [fabrihkka,fábrihkka,fabrijkka,fábrijkka]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ine: [fabrihkan,fábrihkan,fabrijkan,fábrijkan]
    fabrihkka+N+Sg+Ill: [fabrihkkaj,fábrihkkaj,fabrijkkaj,fábrijkkaj]

  Noun - lihtar: # SÅHKÅR, ÅRES
    lihtar+N+Sg+Nom: [lihtar, lijtar, lijter, lihter]
    lihtar+N+Pl+Nom: [lihttara, lijttára, lijttara, lihttára]
    lihtar+N+Sg+Ill: [lihttarij, lijttarij, lijttárij, lihttárij]

  Noun - rássjosuoján: # GAHPER
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Nom: [rássjosuoján,rássjosuojun]
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ine: [rássjosuojánin,rássjosuojunin]
    rássjosuoján+N+Sg+Ill: [rássjosuojánij,rássjosuojunij]
